Hawaii statutes.
[§367D‑1] Female prisoners; parity
programs. Adult women convicted of crimes and juvenile females adjudicated
for offenses that would be crimes if committed by an adult or who are
adjudicated delinquents shall be provided a range and quality of programming
substantially equivalent to the range and quality of programming offered to
male persons who are similarly situated. Programs for female offenders shall
be based upon the psychosocial developmental needs of female offenders. [L
2006, c 258, pt of §2]

Previous
Vol07_Ch0346-0398
Next